Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3,117
Department of Revenue; computation authorized.

(1) When the Department of Revenue finds that the administration of the revenue laws might be more efficiently and economically conducted, the department may require or allow for rounding of all amounts on returns or reports, including amounts of tax. Amounts will be rounded to the nearest dollar, with amounts ending in fifty cents or more rounded to the next highest dollar.

(2) The department may, on an annual basis, eliminate account balances of one dollar or less under uniform procedures developed by the department.

(3) For sales and use tax purposes, the tax computation shall be carried to the third decimal place and rounded down to a whole cent whenever the third decimal place is four or less and rounded up to a whole cent whenever the third decimal place is greater than four.

Laws 1993, LB 345, § 8;

Laws 2003, LB 282, § 5.